Utah, session 2026, HB202.
Section 1. Section 58-72-302 is amended to read:58-72-302. Qualifications for licensure.An applicant for licensure as a licensed acupuncturist shall:(1)submit an application in a form prescribed by the division approves;(2)pay a fee determined by the department underthe department determines in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;(3)pass the examination the division requires by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;(4)establish, in accordance with rule the division makes in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, a procedure to collect a patients informed consent for treatment;(5)at the board's request, meet with the board for evaluation of the applicant's qualifications for licensure; and(3)(6)(a)meet the requirements for current active submit evidence of a current certification in acupuncture under guidelines established by the National Commission for the Certification of Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine (NCCAOM) as demonstrated through a current certificate or other appropriate documentation;that the National Certification Board for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine makes; or(b)submit evidence of completing:(i)an acupuncture curriculum of at least 850 hours of instruction that covers:(A)point location;(B)needle technique;(C)East Asianrelevant medical theory;(D)human anatomy and physiology;(E)professional ethics;(F)boundaries;(G)draping; and(H)consent;(ii)an acupuncture curriculum that meets any other requirements the division makes by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and(iii)at least 500 hours of supervised training in accordance with standards the division makes by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.(4)pass the examination required by the division by rule;(5)establish procedures, as defined by rule, which shall enable patients to give informed consent to treatment; and(6)meet with the board, if requested, for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 58-72-302.5 is enacted to read:58-72-302.5. Qualifications for temporary licensure.(1)The division may issue a temporary license to an applicant for an acupuncture license who:(a)completes the requirements for a licensed acupuncturist in accordance with Subsection 58-72-302(6)(b), except for Subsection 58-72-302(6)(b)(iii); and(b)practices acupuncture under the direct supervision of an acupuncturist licensed in accordance with Section 58-72-302.(2)The temporary license is valid for up to six months.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on November 1, 2026.